Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-138
Fraudulent representation; liability.

Any person who for himself or herself, or on behalf of any other person, procures the filing or registration of any mark in the office of the secretary under the Trademark Registration Act by knowingly making any false or fraudulent representation or declaration, orally or in writing, or by any other fraudulent means, is liable for all damages sustained in consequence of such filing or registration, to be recovered by or on behalf of the party in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 2000, LB 626, § 13.